Louisiana, session 2026, HB697.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Pursuant to R.S. 49:193, the Department of Environmental Quality and
the statutory entities made a part of the department by law shall be re-created effective June
30, 2026, and all statutory authority therefore is continued in accordance with the provisions
of Part XII of Chapter 1 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
Section 2. All statutory authority for the existence of the Department of
Environmental Quality and the statutory entities made a part of the department as re-created
by Section 1 of this Act shall cease as of July 1, 2031, pursuant to R.S. 49:191. However,
the Department of Environmental Quality may be re-created prior to such date in accordance
with the provisions of Part XII of Chapter 1 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950.
Section 3. The provisions of R.S. 49:193 are hereby superseded to the extent that
those provisions are in conflict with the provisions of this Act.
Section 4. R.S. 49:191(3)(b) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 697 ENROLLED
§191. Termination of legislative authority for existence of statutory entities; phase-
out period for statutory entities; table of dates
Notwithstanding any termination dates set by any previous Act of the
legislature, the statutory entities set forth in this Section shall begin to terminate their
operations on July first of each of the following years, and all legislative authority
for the existence of any statutory entity, as defined in R.S. 49:190, shall cease as of
July first of the following year, which shall be the termination date:
* * *
(3) July 1, 2030:
* * *
(b) The Department of Environmental Quality and all statutory entities made
a part of the department by law.
* * *
Section 5. R.S. 49:191(1)(j) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 6. This Act shall become effective on June 30, 2026; if vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on
June 30, 2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.